District of Columbia statutes.
38-932

Repealed

Duties and responsibilities; authorizations; promulgation of rules.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-170, § 7, 33 DCR 7188
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 38, 36 DCR 492
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(j), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 31-2506.